Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB679.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 142.406 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish the criteria to
administer a regional marketing and matching funds program. The program
shall provide financial and marketing assistance for projects that directly support
the promotion and marketing efforts of a tourism attraction, event, or geographic
area.
(2) Tourism regions are established in the Commonwealth as follows:
(a) Tourism Region 1, the Western Lakes and Rivers Region, consisting of
Ballard, Caldwell, Calloway, Carlisle, Christian, Crittenden, Fulton,
Graves, Hickman, Livingston, Lyon, Marshall, McCracken, Todd, and
Trigg Counties;
(b) Tourism Region 2, the Green River Region, consisting of Daviess, Hancock,
Henderson, Hopkins, McLean, Muhlenberg, Ohio, Union, and Webster
Counties;
(c) Tourism Region 3, the Cave Region, consisting of Allen, Barren, Butler,
Edmonson, Hart, Logan, Metcalfe, Monroe, Simpson, and Warren
Counties;
(d) Tourism Region 4, the Louisville-Lincoln Region, consisting of
Breckinridge, Bullitt, Grayson, Hardin, Henry, Jefferson, Larue, Marion,
Meade, Nelson, Oldham, Shelby, Spencer, Trimble, and Washington
Counties;
(e) Tourism Region 5, the Southern Kentucky Lakes and Rivers Region,
consisting of Adair, Casey, Clinton, Cumberland, Green, McCreary,
Pulaski, Russell, Taylor, and Wayne Counties;
Page 1 of 5
BR180700.100 - 1807 - XXXX 3/4/2026 10:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1807
(f) Tourism Region 6, the Northern Kentucky Region, consisting of Boone,
Bracken, Campbell, Carroll, Fleming, Gallatin, Grant, Kenton, Lewis,
Mason, Owen, Pendleton, and Robertson Counties;
(g) Tourism Region 7, the Bluegrass Region, consisting of Anderson, Bourbon,
Boyle, Clark, Fayette, Franklin, Garrard, Harrison, Jessamine, Lincoln,
Madison, Mercer, Nicholas, Scott, and Woodford Counties;
(h) Tourism Region 8, the Eastern Highlands-North Region, consisting of
Bath, Boyd, Carter, Elliott, Floyd, Greenup, Johnson, Lawrence, Magoffin,
Martin, Menifee, Montgomery, Morgan, Pike, and Rowan Counties; and
(i) Tourism Region 9, the Eastern Highlands-South Region, consisting of Bell,
Breathitt, Clay, Estill, Harlan, Jackson, Knott, Knox, Laurel, Lee, Leslie,
Letcher, Owsley, Perry, Powell, Rockcastle, Whitley, and Wolfe Counties.
(3) (a) To qualify for regional marketing and matching funds, a tourism regional
committee shall be established for each tourism region.
(b) Each tourist and convention commission established under KRS 91A.350
within each tourism region shall appoint a person to serve on the tourism
regional committee.
(c) If a tourist and convention commission has not been established by the local
governing bodies of a county, or cities within a county, the county
judge/executive of each county shall appoint a person to serve on the
tourism regional committee.
(d) Counties with multiple tourist and convention commissions may have a
representative from each tourist and convention commission on the tourism
region committee.
(e) The Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall promulgate of administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish the terms and
operating policies of the tourism region committees.
Page 2 of 5
BR180700.100 - 1807 - XXXX 3/4/2026 10:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1807
(4) (a) There is hereby created and established in the State Treasury a trust and
agency account to be known as the tourism, meeting, and convention
marketing fund.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet,
with the approval of the Governor's Office for Policy and Management.
(c)[(2)] All tax receipts from the tax imposed under KRS 142.400 shall be
deposited into the [tourism, meeting, and convention marketing ]fund[,] and
used[shall be appropriated] for the purposes set forth in this subsection[ (3) of
this section]. The fund shall also contain any other money contributed,
allocated, or appropriated to it from any other source.
(d) Moneys[Money] in the fund shall be invested by the Finance and
Administration Cabinet in instruments authorized under KRS 42.500.
Investment proceeds shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.[ Money in
the fund shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year or
biennium.]
(e)[(3)] The tourism, meeting, and convention marketing fund shall be used for
the sole purpose of marketing and promoting tourism in the Commonwealth,
including expenditures to market and promote events and venues related to
meetings, conventions, trade shows, cultural activities, historical sites,
recreation, entertainment, natural phenomena, areas of scenic beauty, craft
marketing, and any other economic activity that brings tourists and visitors to
the Commonwealth. Marketing and promoting tourism shall not include
expenditures on capital construction projects.
(f) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any fund balance at the close of the fiscal
year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
(g) 1. At least twenty-five percent (25%) of the moneys available in the fund
shall be equally divided among the nine (9) tourism regions for
Page 3 of 5
BR180700.100 - 1807 - XXXX 3/4/2026 10:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1807
payment of the following eligible expenses related to marketing and
promoting tourism within the tourism regions:
a. Tourism publications, digital content, and videos;
b. Media advertisements and press kits;
c. Billboards and signage;
d. Brochure distribution services;
e. Postage and freight expenses;
f. Meeting and convention advertising expenses;
g. Group tour marketplace, meeting and convention, and consumer
travel show expenses;
h. Sponsorship or a bid fee of tourism trade shows, conventions,
sporting events, and other events;
i. Website design; and
j. Research studies and analysis.
2. Administrative expenses shall not be included in the payment of
eligible expenses.
3. The Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall work in partnership
with the tourism regional committees to determine the best use of the
money provided to the tourism regions.
(h) At least ten percent (10%) of the moneys available in the fund shall be
dedicated to the regional marketing and matching funds program
established under subsection (1) of this section for use by a convention and
visitors' bureau, a tourism commission, or designated marketing
organization.
(i)[(4)] By September 1 of each year, the secretary of the Tourism, Arts and
Heritage Cabinet shall report to the Governor and the Legislative Research
Commission concerning the receipts, expenditures, and carryforwards of the
Page 4 of 5
BR180700.100 - 1807 - XXXX 3/4/2026 10:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1807
fund for the preceding fiscal year.
(5) By September 1, 2026, the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall implement
initial strategic plans for marketing and promoting tourism in each tourism
region. The cabinet's strategic plan may include a request for proposal process
for selecting vendors to administer spending, create a strategic plan, or manage
day-to-day operations.
(6) By September 1 of each year, the secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage
Cabinet shall submit a report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral
to the Interim Joint Committee on Tourism, Small Business, and Information
Technology on the regional tourism strategies and regional strategic plans.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 148 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Beginning on September 1, 2026, and every September 1 thereafter, the Commissioner
shall submit a report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the
Interim Joint Committee on Tourism, Small Business, and Information Technology on
the occupancy rate for each state park with lodging or a campground from the
previous fiscal year.
Section 3. Whereas tourism is an important aspect of Kentucky's economy, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by
the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
BR180700.100 - 1807 - XXXX 3/4/2026 10:15 AM Jacketed